Oklahoma, session 2025, SB917.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24.1A of Title 51, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any state or education employee who is charged with a felony


by a court of competent jurisdiction shall forfeit all benefits of


the office or employment, including, but not limited to, retirement


benefits provided by law. Upon a felony charge, the employee shall


forfeit the right to access, withdraw from, or liquidate the


retirement benefits of the member.


B. 1. The state prosecutor responsible for the employee’s


charge or charges shall notify the employer and the retirement

Req. No. 1304 Page 1


system of which the employee is a member within three (3) days of


the filed charge. Upon notification, the system shall immediately


implement the requirements of this section.


2. Upon receipt of the notice required by this subsection, the


retirement system shall immediately suspend all benefits of the


employee and notify the employee of his or her right to a hearing to


review whether the charge qualifies for forfeiture of benefits under


this section. If the charge occurs in federal court or the notice


of forfeiture is not forthcoming from the state prosecutor, the


retirement system may investigate and gather court documents and


contact prosecutors to determine whether the charge qualifies under


this section. Upon obtaining sufficient documentation of the


charge, the retirement system shall immediately suspend all benefits


of the employee and notify the employee of his or her right to a


hearing to review whether the charge qualifies for forfeiture of


benefits under this section.


C. Any claims for payment to a member upon being charged with a


felony shall be rejected by the system pursuant to this section.


D. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit access


to retirement benefits by a member who is found not guilty in a


court of competent jurisdiction. If the member is found not guilty,


retirement benefits shall be reinstated, and the member shall regain


access to such benefits. No credit shall be accrued for the time


that benefits are forfeited.

Req. No. 1304 Page 2


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1304 RD 1/19/2025 5:45:57 AM











































Req. No. 1304 Page 3